Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 3
PEACE OFFICER-INVOLVED SHOOTINGS

16-2.5-301. Peace officer actions leading to injury or death investigations - protocol.

Each police department, sheriff's office, and district attorney within the state shall develop protocols for participating in a multi-agency team, which shall include at least one other police department or sheriff's office, or the Colorado bureau of investigation, in conducting any investigation, evaluation, and review of an incident involving the discharge of a firearm by a peace officer that resulted in injury or death, or other use of force by a peace officer that resulted in death. The law enforcement agencies participating need not be from the same judicial district.

Each law enforcement agency shall post the protocol on its website or, if it does not have a website, make it publicly available upon request. The protocols required by this section shall be completed and implemented by December 31, 2015.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire part added, (SB 15-219), ch. 210, p. 769, § 2, effective May 20.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1250), ch. 458, p. 3063, § 7, effective July 6.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 15-219, see section 1 of chapter 210, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.